Alaska statutes. Title 2. Aeronautics.
Article 5. Rural Airstrip and Seaplane Facilities.

Sec. 02.15.160.
Rural airstrip and seaplane facilities.

The department may construct, maintain, or operate floats and seaplane ramp landing facilities, subject to the provisions of AS

02.15.060

,

02.15.070

, and

02.15.120

. The department may construct, maintain, or operate emergency landing fields, or rural airstrips adequate to meet rural needs with or without financial contribution by local interests.

History.

(§ 6 ch 123 SLA 1949)

Sec. 02.15.170.
Duty of department. [Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 02.15.180.
Financial assistance. [Repealed, § 1 ch 94 SLA 1980.]